Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1163.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7309. Work-related hazardous duty.(a) Presumption of work-related hazardous duty.--An individual employed by a life-sustaining business or occupation who is required to work and who contracts, has symptoms of or is otherwise exposed to an infectious disease during the declaration of a disaster emergency under section 7301 (relating to g eneral authority of Governor) , the declaration of an epidemic or a public health emergency in this Commonwealth by the Governor or a pandemic, which results in a period of hospitalization, quarantine, isolation or other control measures due to infection or exposure, shall establish a presumption that 123456789101112131415161718 the individual's medical condition or inability to work is work-related hazardous duty.(b) Hazardous duty deemed on-duty time.--An individual with an established presumption of work-related hazardous duty under subsection (a) may not be required to use sick time, vacation time, personal time or any other accrued paid time off or contractual time off to cover the period of incapacitation or inability to work.(c) Eligibility for unemployment compensation.-- Notwithstanding any provision of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, an individual with an established presumption of work-related hazardous duty under subsection (a) shall be eligible and qualified for unemployment compensation for the duration of the period of incapacitation or inability to work.(d) Eligibility for workers' compensation.--Notwithstanding any provision of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, an individual with an established presumption of work-related hazardous duty under subsection (a) shall be eligible and qualified for workers' compensation for all medical costs related to infection or exposure.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"COVID-19." The novel coronavirus as identified in the Governor's proclamation of disaster emergency issued March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020)."Individual employed by a life-sustaining business or occupation." A front-line employee or other individual who is 20250HB1163PN1289 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employed by or under contract with a life-sustaining business or entity and who is required to work during a public health emergency. The term includes: (1) A first responder, including a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician and any other individual who is considered to be a first responder.(2) A corrections officer or other support staff. (3) An emergency services dispatcher. (4) An ambulance driver. (5) A retail worker, including a restaurant, food services or grocery store worker, cashier or other support staff.(6) A food or agriculture worker. (7) A medical, health care or public health worker, including a doctor, nursing professional, physician assistant, paramedic or other support staff.(8) A pharmacist or any cashier or other support staff. (9) A home health care worker. (10) A public utility worker, including a worker engaged in providing telecommunications, energy, water or wastewater services or public works.(11) An employee of State or local government. (12) A trash collector. (13) A warehouse worker. (14) Any other individual who is employed by a life- sustaining business or occupation and who is required to work during a public health emergency."Infectious disease." As follows: (1) A disease that is:(i) caused by a microorganism, such as a bacterium, 20250HB1163PN1289 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 virus or protozoan;(ii) not normally found in the human body; and(iii) capable of causing infection.(2) The term includes COVID-19 or any other novel virus or infectious disease.(3) Some, but not all, infectious diseases are contagious, meaning that they can spread from person to person, including COVID-19 or the coronavirus. Other infectious diseases can spread from animals or insects to humans, but not from person to person."Life-sustaining business or occupation." A list of businesses or occupations, as designated by the Governor, that perform or conduct a range of vital operations, functions and services that are essential to assisting the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions in protecting people and their communities while ensuring continuity of functions critical and essential to public health and safety, as well as economic and homeland security, and that should continue normal operations, appropriately modified to account for the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's and the Department of Health's workforce and customer protection guidance, during the declaration of a disaster or public health emergency."Public health emergency." An emergency declaration by the Governor of an occurrence or imminent threat of a disease or condition of critical public health importance with the following characteristics:(1) Is believed to be caused by any of the following:(i) The emergence and spread of a novel or previously controlled or eradicated infectious disease.(ii) An infectious disease epidemic in this 20250HB1163PN1289 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth or a pandemic.(2) Poses a high probability of any of the following in the affected population:(i) Death.(ii) Serious or long-term disabilities.(iii) Widespread exposure to an infectious disease, which poses a significant risk of substantial present or future harm to the public health and safety.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1163PN1289 - 5 - 123456789